Illinois, session 104th, HB3504.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $250,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Transportation for establishing a 7pilot program connecting Northern Illinois University students 8from the Aurora area to Northern Illinois University. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.